Hawaii statutes.
§523A-14 Claim of another state to recover
property. (a) Subject to the period of limitation set forth in section
523A-19(c), after property has been paid or delivered to the administrator
under this part, another state may recover the property if:

(1) The property was paid or delivered to the custody
of this State because the records of the holder did not reflect a last known
location of the apparent owner within the borders of the other state and the
other state establishes that the apparent owner or other person entitled to the
property was last known to be located within the borders of that state and
under the laws of that state the property has escheated or become subject to a
claim of abandonment by that state;

(2) The property was paid or delivered to the custody
of this State because the laws of the other state did not provide for the
escheat or custodial taking of the property, and under the laws of that state
subsequently enacted the property has escheated or become subject to a claim of
abandonment by that state;

(3) The records of the holder were erroneous in that
they did not accurately identify the owner of the property and the last known
location of the owner within the borders of another state and under the laws of
that state the property has escheated or become subject to a claim of
abandonment by that state;

(4) The property was subjected to custody by this
State under section 523A-5(6) and under the laws of the state of domicile of
the holder the property has escheated or become subject to a claim of
abandonment by that state; or

(5) The property is a sum payable on a traveler's
check, money order, or similar instrument that was purchased in the other state
and delivered into the custody of this State under section 523A-5(7), and under
the laws of the other state the property has escheated or become subject to a
claim of abandonment by that state.

(b) A claim of another state to recover
escheated or abandoned property shall be presented in a form prescribed by the
administrator, who shall decide the claim within ninety days after it is
presented. The administrator shall allow the claim upon determining that the
other state is entitled to the abandoned property under subsection (a).

(c) The administrator shall require another
state, before recovering property under this section, to agree to indemnify
this State and its officers and employees against any liability on a claim to
the property. [L 2008, c 55, pt of §1; am L 2014, c 184, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next